Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2290
Department; adopt rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to aid in implementing the Pseudorabies Control and Eradication Act. The rules and regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, provisions governing:

(1) The conduct of the feeder and breeding swine testing program, including provisions governing: (a) When, where, how, by whom, and how often testing is to be done; (b) what swine are to be subjected to testing; (c) how and by whom results of testing are to be recorded; (d) by whom and to whom the results of the testing are to be reported; and (e) how, by whom, and for what purposes such results will be utilized;

(2) The conduct of the pseudorabies control and eradication program, including provisions governing: (a) When, where, how, by whom, and how often testing is to be done; (b) what swine are to be subjected to testing; (c) requirements of swine herd cleanup plans, including form, execution, contents, duration, amendments, and enforcement; (d) how and by whom results of testing are to be recorded; (e) by whom and to whom the results of the testing are to be reported; (f) how, by whom, and for what purposes such results will be utilized; and (g) assignment of and requirements for titles for status swine herds and the suspension, expiration, and cancellation of such titles;

(3) The conduct of surveillance in swine herds and at slaughter establishments and concentration points, including provisions governing: (a) When, where, how, by whom, and how often testing is to be done; (b) what swine and swine herds are to be subjected to testing; (c) how and by whom results of testing are to be recorded and reported; and (d) the use of the results of testing by the department;

(4) Importation of swine, including provisions governing: (a) Age, origin, entry, movement, and destination in the state; (b) when, where, how, by whom, and how often imported swine are to be subjected to testing; (c) what imported swine are to be subjected to testing; and (d) how testing results are to be recorded, reported, and utilized;

(5)(a) What constitutes a program area; (b) what epidemiological factors will be considered in determining the program area; and (c) when and for what purpose a program activity will be selected;

(6) The issuance and release of quarantines and the requirements regarding the handling, movement, and disposition of livestock under quarantine;

(7) The cleaning and disinfecting of affected premises, including provisions governing: (a) The materials to be used; (b) the procedures to be used; and (c) when such procedures are to be performed;

(8) The testing of livestock to detect pseudorabies, including provisions governing: (a) Which tests are to be deemed official tests; (b) by whom the testing is to be administered; (c) how the testing is to be conducted; (d) the reaction tolerances to be recognized; and (e) the classification of results as to negative, suspect, or positive. These rules and regulations shall be consistent with the best available scientific information relative to the control and eradication of pseudorabies;

(9) The pseudorabies vaccination program, including provisions governing: (a) The vaccines to be used; (b) the age of the swine to be vaccinated; (c) the effect of vaccination on the interpretation of test results; and (d) the reported sale and use of vaccine;

(10) The identification of swine subject to the act, including provisions governing: (a) Exposed and infected swine; (b) vaccinated swine; and (c) swine to be tested;

(11) Random sampling of swine herds, including provisions governing: (a) When, where, how, by whom, and how often a random sample is to be used in testing swine herds; (b) when and for what purpose a random sample of a swine herd will be subjected to testing; (c) the number of feeder, breeding, and other swine in a particular status swine herd or in a swine herd which is not a status swine herd constituting a random sample to be subjected to testing; (d) the age of swine in a status swine herd and a swine herd which is not a status swine herd to be used as a random sample and subjected to testing; and (e) how testing results are to be recorded, reported, and utilized;

(12) Compliance with Part III Program Stages and Requirements of the State-Federal-Industry Program Standards for Pseudorabies Eradication as approved by the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, Veterinary Services, in effect on January 1, 2002;

(13) Compliance with 9 C.F.R. part 85, in effect on January 1, 2002, for pseudorabies control and eradication;

(14) Administration of the pseudorabies control and eradication program subject to the availability of state funds;

(15) The assessment and collection of costs for services provided and expenses, not to exceed actual costs, incurred under the act;

(16) The preparation, maintenance, handling, filing, and disposition of records and reports by persons subject to the act concerning the vaccination, testing, or movement of swine;

(17) Program activities and cleanup testing under the act on which state funds, if appropriated and available, shall be used by the department and limitations on use of such state funds for testing and other activities under the act; and

(18) Any other areas deemed necessary by the department to effectively control and eradicate pseudorabies.

Laws 1986, LB 775, § 25;

Laws 1990, LB 1004, § 20;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 54-2225;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 56;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 23;

Laws 1996, LB 965, § 13;

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 69.